Utah statutes.
70A-8-404.    Wrongful registration.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 70A-8-406, an issuer is liable
for wrongful registration of transfer if the issuer has registered a transfer
of a security to a person not entitled to it, and the transfer was registered:
(a)  pursuant to an ineffective indorsement or instruction;
(b)  after a demand that the issuer not register transfer became effective
under Subsection 70A-8-403(1) and the issuer did not comply with Subsection
70A-8-403(2);
(c)  after the issuer had been served with an injunction, restraining order,
or other legal process enjoining it from registering the transfer, issued by a
court of competent jurisdiction, and the issuer had a reasonable opportunity
to act on the injunction, restraining order, or other legal process; or
(d)  by an issuer acting in collusion with the wrongdoer.
(2)  An issuer that is liable for wrongful registration of transfer under
Subsection (1) on demand shall provide the person entitled to the security
with a like certificated or uncertificated security, and any payments or
distributions that the person did not receive as a result of the wrongful
registration.  If an overissue would result, the issuer's liability to provide
the person with a like security is governed by Section 70A-8-210.
(3)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (1) or in a law relating to
the collection of taxes, an issuer is not liable to an owner or other person
suffering loss as a result of the registration of a transfer of a security if
registration was made pursuant to an effective indorsement or instruction.
